Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1159.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-5.2-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-5.2-20. Childcare assistance — Families or assistance units eligible. [Effective
January 1, 2025.]
(a) The department shall provide appropriate child care to every participant who is eligible
for cash assistance and who requires child care in order to meet the work requirements in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) Low-income child care. The department shall provide child care to all other working
families with incomes at or below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal poverty
level if, and to the extent, these other families require child care in order to work at paid
employment as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. The department shall also provide
child care to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal
poverty level if, and to the extent, these families require child care to participate on a short-term
basis, as defined in the department’s rules and regulations, in training, apprenticeship, internship,
on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other job-readiness/job-attachment
program sponsored or funded by the human resource investment council (governor’s workforce
board) or state agencies that are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to § 42-102-11.
Effective from January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare
assistance to families with incomes below one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal poverty

level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain
enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education provided that eligibility to
receive funding is capped when expenditures reach $200,000 for this provision. Effective July 1,
2022 through December 31, 2024, the department shall also provide childcare assistance to families
with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level when such assistance
is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island
public institution of higher education. Effective January 1, 2025, the department shall also provide
childcare assistance to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the
federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or
maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.
(c) No family/assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter if
the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which
corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth
in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. Liquid resources are defined as any
interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or accounts that are readily
convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These include, but are not limited to: cash, bank, credit
union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money market accounts; certificates of
deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and other similar financial instruments
or accounts. These do not include educational savings accounts, plans, or programs; retirement
accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with another adult, not including a spouse.
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to determine the ownership and
source of the funds in the joint account.
(d) As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or
caretaker relative of the family must consent to, and must cooperate with, the department in
establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support
orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in
accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker
relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care, including infant,
toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school-age, that is provided by a person or organization
qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies designated
to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth herein.
(f)(1) Families with incomes below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable federal
poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free child care. Families with incomes greater than
LC003078 - Page 2 of 8

one hundred percent (100%) and less than two hundred percent (200%) of the applicable federal
poverty guideline shall be required to pay for some portion of the child care they receive, according
to a sliding-fee scale adopted by the department in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section.
(2) Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for
childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding two hundred sixty-one percent (261%)
of the applicable federal poverty guidelines shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance
until their incomes exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal poverty
guidelines. To be eligible, the families must continue to pay for some portion of the child care they
receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section, and in accordance with all other
eligibility standards.
(g) In determining the type of child care to be provided to a family, the department shall
take into account the cost of available childcare options; the suitability of the type of care available
for the child; and the parent’s preference as to the type of child care.
(h) For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §
40-5.2-11 means gross, earned income and unearned income, subject to the income exclusions in
§§ 40-5.2-10(g)(2) and 40-5.2-10(g)(3), and income for other families shall mean gross, earned and
unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.
(i) The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast
the expenditures for child care in accordance with the provisions of § 35-17-1.
(j) In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve
components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family
composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior
to the month of leaving for active duty. This shall continue until the individual is officially
discharged from active duty.
(k) Effective from August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2025 2028, the department shall
provide funding for child care for eligible childcare educators, and childcare staff, who work at
least twenty (20) hours a week in licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare homes
as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. Eligibility is limited to qualifying childcare
educators and childcare staff with family incomes up to three hundred percent (300%) of the
applicable federal poverty guidelines and will have no copayments. Qualifying participants may
select the childcare center or family childcare home for their children. The department shall
promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section, and will collect applicant and
LC003078 - Page 3 of 8

participant data to report estimated demand for state-funded child care for eligible childcare
educators and childcare staff. The report shall be due annually to the governor and the general
assembly by November 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 40-6.2-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-6.2 entitled "Child
Care — State Subsidies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-6.2-1.1. Rates established.
(a) Through June 30, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth
and families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based
on the following schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the
average of the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates:
Licensed Childcare Centers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $182.00
Preschool $150.00
School-Age $135.00
Licensed Family Childcare Providers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $150.00
Preschool $150.00
School-Age $135.00
Effective July 1, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum
reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and
families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based on the
above schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the average of
the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates. These rates shall be increased by
ten dollars ($10.00) per week for infant/toddler care provided by licensed family childcare
providers and license-exempt providers and then the rates for all providers for all age groups shall
be increased by three percent (3%). For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, licensed childcare
centers shall be reimbursed a maximum weekly rate of one hundred ninety-three dollars and sixty-
four cents ($193.64) for infant/toddler care and one hundred sixty-one dollars and seventy-one
cents ($161.71) for preschool-age children.
(b) Effective July l, 2018, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum infant/toddler and preschool-age reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of
human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
LC003078 - Page 4 of 8

the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1.
(1) For infant/toddler child care, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half percent
(2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above
the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed twenty percent (20%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed thirty-three percent (33%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount.
(2) For preschool reimbursement rates, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half
percent (2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%)
above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed ten percent (10%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed twenty-one percent (21%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount.
(c) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 4.]
(d) By June 30, 2004, and biennially through June 30, 2014, the department of labor and
training shall conduct an independent survey or certify an independent survey of the then-current
weekly market rates for child care in Rhode Island and shall forward the weekly market rate survey
to the department of human services. The next survey shall be conducted by June 30, 2016, and
triennially thereafter. The departments of human services and labor and training will jointly
determine the survey criteria including, but not limited to, rate categories and sub-categories.
(e) In order to expand the accessibility and availability of quality child care, the department
of human services is authorized to establish, by regulation, alternative or incentive rates of
reimbursement for quality enhancements, innovative or specialized child care, and alternative
methodologies of childcare delivery, including nontraditional delivery systems and collaborations.
(f) Effective January 1, 2007, all childcare providers have the option to be paid every two
(2) weeks and have the option of automatic direct deposit and/or electronic funds transfer of
reimbursement payments.
(g) Effective July 1, 2019, the maximum infant/toddler reimbursement rates to be paid by
the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed family childcare
providers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has
achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Tier one shall be
reimbursed two percent (2%) above the prevailing base rate for step 1 and step 2 providers, three
percent (3%) above prevailing base rate for step 3 providers, and four percent (4%) above the
prevailing base rate for step 4 providers; tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the
LC003078 - Page 5 of 8

prevailing base rate; tier three shall be reimbursed eleven percent (11%) above the prevailing base
rate; tier four shall be reimbursed fourteen percent (14%) above the prevailing base rate; and tier
five shall be reimbursed twenty-three percent (23%) above the prevailing base rate.
(h) Through December 31, 2021, the maximum reimbursement rates paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families to licensed childcare centers shall
be consistent with the enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $273.00
Preschool Age $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $260.00
School Age $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $245.00
The maximum reimbursement rates paid by the departments of human services, and
children, youth and families to licensed family childcare providers shall be consistent with the
enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43
Preschool Age $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45
School Age $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30
(i) Effective January 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the
departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall
be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $236.36 $244.88 $257.15 $268.74 $284.39
Preschool $207.51 $212.27 $218.45 $223.50 $231.39
School-Age $180.38 $182.77 $185.17 $187.57 $189.97
The maximum reimbursement rates for licensed family childcare providers paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families is determined through collective
bargaining. The maximum reimbursement rates for infant/toddler and preschool age children paid
to licensed family childcare providers by both departments is implemented in a tiered manner that
reflects the quality rating the provider has achieved in accordance with § 42-12-23.1.
(j) Effective July 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
LC003078 - Page 6 of 8

implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $265 $270 $282 $289 $300
Preschool $225 $235 $243 $250 $260
School-Age $200 $205 $220 $238 $250
(k) Effective July 1, 2024, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschool $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
School-Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
(l) Effective July 1, 2025, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant $334 $341 $355 $364 $378
Toddlers $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschoolers $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
School Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003078
========
LC003078 - Page 7 of 8